Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1589
Debts and liability; responsibility.

Except to the extent such city or county or this state may expressly elect to undertake such liability, neither any city or county with respect to which a local housing agency is established, nor any city or county participating in a regional housing agency, nor the state, nor any other public agency of this state shall be responsible for the debts or liabilities of any local housing agency or regional housing agency.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 18.